District of Columbia statutes.
21-2063

General duty of conservator.

A conservator, in relation to powers conferred by this subchapter, or implicit in the title acquired by virtue of the proceeding, shall act as a fiduciary and observe the standards of care applicable to trustees.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., § 21-2063.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-316 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).